Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB8.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of amending the present Constitution of Kentucky
to add a new section allowing the General Assembly to establish the date a regular
session shall end, and to meet in regular session for no more than twelve additional days
during any calendar year if convened by a Joint Proclamation of the President of the
Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives?
SECTION 2. IT IS PROPOSED THAT A NEW SECTION BE ADDED TO
THE CONSTITUTION OF KENTUCKY TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding the dates certain in Section 42 of this Constitution, a
regular session shall end on the date established by law by the General Assembly
unless another date shall be agreed upon by three-fifths of all members elected to each
House.
(2) In addition to regular sessions, the General Assembly may be convened by
Joint Proclamation of the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives in no more than two additional sessions for no more than twelve total
legislative days annually, during which it may adjourn from time to time.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act and the
entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section
2 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation
published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/30/2025 2:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1110
same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their
acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State, not later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August
preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be
chosen in a year in which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the
United States, or not later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September
preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice
President of the United States, shall certify the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this
Act and the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky
contained in Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk
shall have the entirety of the question and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on
the ballots provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting
machines in use in each county or precinct.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/30/2025 2:34 PM Jacketed